Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 2
COMMODITIES

35-36-201. Licenses - commodity handler - rules.

A person shall not act as a commodity handler in this state without having first obtained a license from the department.

A small-volume commodity handler need not obtain a license.

Every person acting as a commodity handler in this state shall, each year before the date specified by the commissioner by rule, obtain or renew a license from the department.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 724, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-103 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-202. Exemptions.

The provisions of this part 2 that apply to warehouse operators do not apply to the owner or operator of a public warehouse or other facility where the owner or operator:

Operates a public warehouse in this state with a valid license issued either by the United States department of agriculture or under the "United States Warehouse Act", 7 U.S.C. sec. 241 et seq.;

Receives only commodities that the owner or operator has purchased, that the owner or operator is processing or cleaning for the owners of the commodities, or that the owner or operator is maintaining for such other purposes as the department may, by rule, prescribe; and

Keeps written evidence, as required by the department, that clearly shows that the warehouse operator maintains the commodities for one or more of the purposes set forth in subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section. The department shall consider a commodity left or deposited with a warehouse operator whose records do not include evidence that the commodity was left or deposited for one or more of the purposes set forth in subsection (1)(a) or (1)(b) of this section as a commodity deposited for storage and handling.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 725, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-104 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-203. Commodity handler licenses - application requirements - fee.

An applicant for a commodity handler license shall pay, for each year in which the license is to be valid, a license fee established by the commission, which license fee the department shall collect and transmit to the state treasurer, who shall credit the money to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

For each fiscal year, commencing on July 1, twenty-five percent of the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this article 36 shall be funded from the general fund. The commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover any direct and indirect costs not funded from the general fund.

Application for a commodity handler license under this section shall be made to the department upon forms furnished by the department. The application must include the following information:

The name and address of the applicant and, if the applicant is a firm, exchange, association, or corporation, the full name of each member of the firm or the names of the officers of the exchange, association, or corporation;

The principal business address of the applicant in the state of Colorado and in every other state in which the applicant does business and the names of the persons authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notices of all kinds on behalf of the applicant in each state. The applicant must satisfy the commissioner of its character, responsibility, and good faith in seeking to carry on the business stated in the application. The commissioner shall make a determination of a person's character in accordance with section 24-5-101.

The location of each public warehouse of the applicant;

The total rated storage capacity in bushels of each public warehouse;

The tariff schedule of charges to be made at each public warehouse for the handling, storage, and shipment of commodities during the license year; and

Any other information that the commissioner deems reasonably necessary to carry out the purposes of this part 2.

The commissioner shall revoke any license granted as a result of an application that is found to have been made through fraud or misrepresentation. All indicia of the possession of a license is the property of the state of Colorado, and each licensee is entitled to the possession of the indicia only while the license remains valid and current.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 725, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-105 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-204. Licenses - requirements - rules.

To receive or maintain a license, each applicant or licensee for an initial or renewal license must satisfy the following requirements:

Except as provided in subsection (1)(a)(II) of this section, the applicant or licensee shall furnish the commissioner with evidence of minimum provisional insurance coverage in an amount sufficient to protect the applicant's storage obligations. If, at any time, the commissioner evaluates an applicant's provisional insurance coverage to be insufficient, the commissioner may require such additional insurance as the commissioner considers sufficient. Failure to provide evidence of the additional insurance within thirty days after written notice from the commissioner constitutes grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license.

A small-volume commodity handler need not comply with subsection (1)(a)(I) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(b)(III) of this section, the applicant must furnish the commissioner with a financial statement that presents accurately the applicant's or licensee's financial condition. The commissioner may promulgate rules that clearly state the information required from each applicant or licensee under this section. Any financial statement submitted to the commissioner in support of a license application made pursuant to this part 2 is confidential.

Whenever the commissioner deems it appropriate, the commissioner may require an applicant for an initial license, an applicant for a renewal of a license, or a licensee to submit a financial statement or an audit prepared by a certified public accountant or any other information the commissioner deems necessary to determine whether the person is in an adequate financial position to carry out the person's duties as a licensee.

A small-volume commodity handler need not comply with the financial statement submission requirement set forth in subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section.

If a licensee fails to apply for license renewal before an annual date specified by the commissioner by rule, the licensee shall, upon application for a renewal license and before the license is issued, pay a penalty as established by the commission. The penalty is in addition to the license fee.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 726, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-106 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-205. Disciplinary powers - licenses.

The commissioner may deny an application for a license, refuse to renew a license, revoke or suspend a license, or place a licensee on probation, as the case may require, if the licensee or applicant has:

Violated this part 2 or section 35-36-104 or violated any of the rules promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this article 36;

Failed to place and keep the premises of the licensed business in the manner required under this part 2;

Been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, or of any other state, or of the United States; except that, in consideration of the conviction of a felony, the commissioner is governed by section 24-5-101;

Committed fraud or deception in the procurement or attempted procurement of a license;

With respect to a commodity handler applicant or licensee, failed or refused to execute and deliver to the commissioner a surety bond as required by section 35-36-216;

Been determined by the commissioner to be in an inadequate financial position to meet liability obligations;

Failed to comply with any lawful order of the commissioner concerning the administration of this part 2; or

Had a license revoked, suspended, or not renewed or has been placed on probation in another state for cause, if the cause could be the basis for similar disciplinary action in this state.

All proceedings concerning the denial, refusal to renew, revocation, or suspension of a license or the placing of a licensee on probation shall be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24.

Any previous violation of this part 2 or section 35-36-104 by the applicant or any person connected with the applicant in the business for which the applicant seeks to be licensed or, in the case of a partnership or corporation applicant, any previous violations of this part 2 or section 35-36-104 by a partner, officer, director, or stockholder of more than thirty percent of the outstanding shares, is sufficient grounds for the denial of a license.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 727, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-107 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-206. Bailment of commodities.

Acceptance of commodities for storage by a warehouse operator constitutes a bailment and not a sale. Stored commodities are not subject to seizure upon process of a court in an action against the bailee, except upon action by owners of the stored commodities or the commissioner to enforce the terms of the bailment; but, in the event of the failure or insolvency of a bailee, commodities shall be first applied exclusively to the settlement on an equal basis of all outstanding negotiable warehouse receipts and other open storage obligations for commodities so stored with the bailee.

Forwarded commodities shall be used only to meet the storage obligation to the forwarding warehouse operator.

The purchase of a commodity does not constitute a bailment.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 728, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-108 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-207. Credit sale contracts - rules.

When a commodity handler purchases commodities for which payment has not been made, the commodity handler, within thirty days after the receipt of the commodities, shall provide the producer or owner of the commodities with the credit sale contract. The credit sale contract must contain the following information:

The class, grade, and quantity of the commodities purchased, and the date of the purchase;

The charges for handling, if any;

The name and address of the producer or owner and the signature of the commodity handler;

The contract number;

The words "not a storage contract" printed in block capital letters in bold-faced type, conspicuously on the first page of the contract;

One or more statements specified by the commissioner by rule, including one that warns a producer that entering into a credit sale contract entails a risk that the bond may not completely protect the producer from loss in the event of a failure of the commodity handler.

A commodity handler or a small-volume commodity handler shall retain records for a period of two years and shall keep the records at the commodity handler's or the small-volume commodity handler's place of business at all times.

With respect to a credit sale contract, a commodity handler shall retain records for a period of two years after the date of completion of the credit sale contract.

The records must reflect those credit sale contracts that have been canceled and those that are still open and be kept at the commodity handler's place of business at all times.

The commissioner shall require an annual report of the status of the credit sale contracts along with the financial statement required in section 35-36-204 (1)(b).

A commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler shall consecutively number all credit sale contracts entered into by the commodity handler and make available copies of the credit sale contracts for inspection and examination by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agents.

A commodity handler issuing credit sale contracts shall maintain allowable net assets of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars and shall maintain reserves in an amount equaling or exceeding one hundred percent of the value of all of that commodity handler's open credit sale contracts, which value shall be determined with reference to the daily bid price. The reserves may be in the form of any one or a combination of the following:

Cash;

Commodity assets, including commodities and warehouse receipts or other evidence of storage of commodities;

Credit sale contracts with other commodity handlers licensed by the department; or

An irrevocable letter of credit in favor of the commissioner, which letter of credit is subject to section 35-36-216.

A small-volume commodity handler shall not enter into or offer to enter into a credit sale contract.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 728, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-109 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-208. Commodity grades established - rules.

The department may promulgate rules concerning commodity grades in accordance with the standards established by the United States department of agriculture as the official grain standards of the United States government.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 729, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-110 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-209. Negotiable warehouse receipts - rules.

A negotiable warehouse receipt must be either a paper or an electronic document. At no time may a paper receipt and an electronic receipt represent the same lot of the commodity. A licensee may issue warehouse receipts by use of a written warehouse receipt system, an electronic warehouse receipt system, or both.

The department is the sole source of paper negotiable warehouse receipts and shall furnish those receipts at cost.

Instead of a paper document, a licensee may issue an electronic negotiable version of a warehouse receipt generated by a vendor licensed and approved by the United States department of agriculture if the receipt contains the same information as the paper version of a warehouse receipt. The electronic version of a warehouse receipt carries the same rights and obligations as the paper version. A holder of an electronic version of a warehouse receipt may redeem the warehouse receipt by applying an electronic signature registered and authenticated by a vendor credited by the United States department of agriculture.

The commissioner may promulgate rules regarding the issuance, use, and records requirements of negotiable warehouse receipts.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 729, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-112 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-210. Use of scale tickets and negotiable warehouse receipts.

It is unlawful to issue paper negotiable warehouse receipts other than those furnished by the department. A licensee shall issue these receipts consecutively, as numbered, and each receipt must state the date on which it is actually issued.

Nothing in this part 2 prevents the issuance of nonnegotiable scale tickets or other nonnegotiable evidence of a similar nature showing the date on which the commodities were received, the quantities received, and the condition of the commodities upon their delivery.

When partial withdrawal of a commodity is made by an owner, the warehouse operator shall make an appropriate notation of the partial withdrawal on the depositor's nonnegotiable warehouse receipt or on such other records as may be prescribed by the department. If, before the partial withdrawal of the commodity, the warehouse operator has issued a negotiable warehouse receipt to the owner, the warehouse operator shall claim, cancel, and replace it with a new negotiable warehouse receipt, showing the amount of the owner's commodity remaining in the public warehouse.

Every commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler receiving commodities for storage or handling shall immediately, upon receipt of each load, issue to every person delivering the commodity a scale ticket, which must contain the net weight of each separate draft or load of the commodity and the dockage, if any, to be levied at the time of delivery, and such other information as may be required by the department.

Acceptance of commodities for storage by a warehouse operator for which a negotiable warehouse receipt is issued constitutes a bailment process and not a sale. If a warehouse operator fails to claim and cancel a negotiable warehouse receipt issued on delivery for commodities stored in the warehouse operator's public warehouse and the negotiation of which would transfer the right of possession of that commodity, the warehouse operator is liable, to a good faith purchaser for value, for the warehouse operator's failure to deliver to the purchaser all the commodities specified in the receipt. This liability applies whether the purchaser acquired title to the negotiable warehouse receipt before, on, or after the delivery of any part of the commodity by the warehouse operator.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 730, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-113 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-211. Commodity handler records - separate and distinct - time of maintenance - definition.

A commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler operating another business in conjunction with, or in proximity to, the handler's commodity handling business shall keep a complete set of records for the commodity handling business, entirely separate and distinct from the accounts and records of that other business. The deposits of commodities for the account of another business or for commodities owned by the commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler shall be entered in the books of the commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler in the same manner as those of other depositors. For the purpose of this section, "other business" means any other separate and legally established enterprise that is distinct and separate from the legal and financial transactions of the commodity handling business.

Commodity handlers or small-volume commodity handlers shall maintain adequate records and systems for the filing and accounting of negotiable warehouse receipts, canceled negotiable warehouse receipts, scale tickets, and other documents and transactions necessary or common to the commodity handling industry. A commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler shall retain canceled negotiable warehouse receipts, copies of scale tickets, and copies of other documents evidencing ownership or ownership liability for a period of at least three years after the date of cancellation.

A commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler shall post a position report daily; however, if a daily position report poses a substantial hardship, the commissioner may authorize, in writing, a weekly position report. The position report must include, but need not be limited to, total stocks by commodities received or loaded out, forwarding of commodities to terminal storage, conversions of whole commodities to feed, negotiable warehouse receipt obligations, open storage obligations, credit sale contracts, and public-warehouse-owned commodities.

A scale ticket shall be issued for each receipt of commodities. A copy of the scale ticket shall be given to the owner. A commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler shall file the commodity handler's or small-volume commodity handler's copy with all other such copies in numerical sequence and shall file and retain voided scale tickets at the commodity handler's or small-volume commodity handler's place of business. Scale tickets shall be issued in numerical sequence. An issued scale ticket must contain the following: Sequential number; date; owner's name; commodity handler's or small-volume commodity handler's name; commodity; test weight with dockage, if applicable; grade, if assigned; gross weight; tare weight; and net weights, in the case of weights from hopper scales.

A settlement sheet shall be maintained for each owner and shall contain the following: Owner's name; scale ticket numbers; total receipts; total withdrawals; test weight; and grade, if assigned. A copy of a current settlement sheet shall be provided to the owner upon request.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 731, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-114 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-212. Warehouse operator's liability for disposal of tainted commodities.

A warehouse operator is liable for any loss or deterioration of commodities in a public warehouse caused by the warehouse operator's failure to exercise reasonable care of the commodities.

If a warehouse operator discovers that, as a result of a condition of a commodity placed in the warehouse operator's public warehouse of which the warehouse operator had no notice at the time of deposit, the commodity is a hazard to other commodities or to persons or to the public warehouse and if the commodity is not immediately removed by the owner upon the warehouse operator's request, the warehouse operator may sell the commodity after reasonable notice to all persons known to claim an interest in the commodity. If the warehouse operator is unable to sell the commodity after a reasonable effort, the warehouse operator may dispose of it in any other lawful manner, and shall incur no liability to the owner for the disposition.

At any time before the sale or disposition authorized in this section, the warehouse operator shall deliver the commodity to any person entitled to it upon proper demand and payment of all charges incurred for the specific lot of that commodity.

The commissioner may reject as unsuitable for storage any area of the warehouse operator's premises, unless that area is used for storing the warehouse operator's own commodities.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 732, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-115 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-213. Enforcement - inspection of commodity handlers' property - confidentiality.

The department has the power to inspect commodity handlers' places of business. The department shall investigate any complaint concerning the operation of any commodity handler or any person attempting or offering to act as a commodity handler, subject to this part 2.

Complaints of record made to the commissioner and the results of the commissioner's investigations may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be closed to public inspection during the investigatory period and until dismissed or until notice of hearing and charges is served on a licensee, unless otherwise provided by court order.

The commissioner, upon consent of the licensee or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant, has the right to inspect any commodity handler's place of business where commodities are stored, handled, or received and any records pertaining to storage obligations and commodity positions kept by the commodity handler that pertain to the operation of the place of business. The property, books, records, accounts, and papers pertaining to storage obligations and commodity positions of every commodity handler are subject to inspection and copying by the commissioner.

The commissioner has full authority to administer oaths and take statements, to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments, and to compel the disclosure by the witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of a witness to obey a subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey such an order of the court is punishable as a contempt of court.

The commissioner may examine the ledgers, books, accounts, memoranda, and other documents and the commodities, scales, measures, and other items in connection with the business of any licensee relating to whatever transactions may be involved.

The commissioner is not required to investigate or act upon complaints regarding transactions that occurred more than one hundred twenty days before the date upon which the commissioner received the written complaint.

If the investigation is against a licensee, the commissioner shall proceed to ascertain the names and addresses of all producers, dealers, or owners of commodities, together with the accounts unaccounted for or due and owing to them by the licensee, and shall request the producers, dealers, or owners to file verified statements of their respective claims with the commissioner. If a producer, dealer, or owner fails, refuses, or neglects to file a verified statement in the office of the commissioner within thirty days after the date of the request, the commissioner is relieved of any further duty or action under this part 2 on behalf of the producer, dealer, or owner.

In the course of any investigation, the commissioner may attempt to effectuate a settlement between the respective parties.

If the commissioner determines, after concluding an investigation on any complaint, that reasonable grounds exist to believe that a licensee has violated this part 2, the commissioner shall notify the licensee that the complaint is valid and shall inform the licensee of the licensee's opportunity to request a hearing, in writing, on the complaint within ten days after the date of the notice.

Upon the receipt of a request for a hearing from a licensee or if the commissioner determines that a hearing concerning any licensee is necessary, the commissioner shall cause a copy of the complaint or the grounds specified in section 35-36-205, together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing, to be served personally or by mail upon the licensee. Service shall be made at least ten days before the hearing, which shall be held in the city or town in which the business location of the licensee is situated or in which the transactions involved allegedly occurred or at any convenient place designated by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall conduct the hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105. Thereafter, the commissioner shall enter a decision specifying the relevant facts established at the hearing. If the commissioner determines from the facts specified that the licensee has not violated this part 2 or section 35-36-104, the commissioner shall dismiss the complaint. If the commissioner determines from the facts specified that the licensee has violated this part 2 or section 35-36-104, and that the licensee has not yet made complete restitution to the person complaining, the commissioner shall determine the amount of damages, if any, to which the person is entitled as the result of the violation and shall enter an order directing the offender to pay the amount to the person complaining on or before the date fixed in the order. A copy of the decision shall be furnished to all the respective parties to the complaint.

As a result of the hearing, the commissioner may also enter any order suspending or revoking the license of a licensee or may place the licensee on probation if the commissioner determines that the licensee has committed any of the unlawful acts specified in section 35-36-217 or that the licensee has violated this part 2 or section 35-36-104.

If a person against whom an order, as specified in subsection (9)(c) of this section, is made and issued fails, neglects, or refuses to obey the order within the time specified in the order, the commissioner may issue a further order to that person directing the person to show cause why the person's license should not be suspended or revoked for failure to comply with the order.

In such case, a copy of the order to show cause, together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing, shall be served personally or by mail upon the person involved. Service shall be made at least ten days before the hearing, which shall be held in the city or town in which the business location of the licensee is situated or at any convenient place designated by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall conduct the hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105 and thereafter shall enter an order and decision specifying the facts established at the hearing and either dismissing the order to show cause, or directing the suspension or revocation of the license held by the licensee, or making such other conditional or probationary orders as may be proper. A copy of the order and decision shall be furnished to the licensee.

Nothing in this section limits the power of the commissioner to revoke or suspend a license when the commissioner is satisfied that one or more of the acts specified in section 35-36-217 was committed.

Whenever the absence of records or other circumstances makes it impossible or unreasonable for the commissioner to ascertain the names and addresses of all persons specified in subsection (7) of this section, the commissioner, after exercising due diligence and making a reasonable inquiry to secure the information from all reasonable and available sources, is not liable or responsible for the claims or the handling of claims that may subsequently appear or be discovered. After ascertaining all claims, assessments, and statements in the manner set forth in subsection (7) of this section, the commissioner may then demand payment on the bond or irrevocable letter of credit on behalf of those claimants whose claims have been determined by the commissioner as valid and, in the instance of a bond, may settle or compromise the claims with the surety company on the bond and execute and deliver a release and discharge of the bond involved. Upon the refusal of the surety company to pay the demand, the commissioner may bring an action on the bond on behalf of the producer, dealer, or owner.

For the purpose of this section, a transaction is deemed to have occurred:

On the date that possession of commodities is transferred by a claimant; or

In the case of delayed payment transactions, on the contractual date of payment or, if there is no contractual date of payment, thirty days following the transfer of title.

A commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler shall maintain a public warehouse in a manner adequate to provide a convenient and safe means of ingress and egress to the various storage bins and compartments by those persons authorized to make inspections.

Each warehouse shall be kept open for the purpose of receiving commodities for storage and delivering commodities out of storage every business day for a period of not less than six hours between the hours of 8 a.m. and 6 p.m., except as provided in subsection (15)(b) of this section. The commodity handler or small-volume commodity handler shall post conspicuously on the door of the public entrance to the commodity handler's or small-volume commodity handler's office and to the commodity handler's or small-volume commodity handler's warehouse a notice showing the hours during which the warehouse will be kept open; except that the notice is not necessary when a warehouse is kept open continuously from 8 a.m. to 6 p.m.

Whenever a warehouse is not to be kept open as required by subsection (15)(a) of this section, the notice posted as prescribed in subsection (15)(a) of this section must state the period during which the warehouse is to be closed and the name, address, and telephone number, if any, of the person who is authorized to deliver commodities stored in the warehouse upon lawful demand by the depositor of the commodity or the holder of the receipt of the commodity, as the case may be.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 732, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-116 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-214. Procedure on shortage - refusal to submit to inspection.

Whenever it appears probable after investigation that a licensed warehouse operator does not possess sufficient commodities to cover the outstanding negotiable warehouse receipts, scale tickets, or other evidence of storage liability issued or assumed by the warehouse operator, the department may give notice to the warehouse operator that the warehouse operator is required to do all or any of the following:

Cover the shortage;

Give an additional bond or irrevocable letter of credit;

Submit to such inspection as the department may deem necessary.

If the warehouse operator fails to comply with the terms of the notice within twenty-four hours after the date of its issuance or within such further time as the department may allow, the department may do all or any of the following:

Issue a cease-and-desist order pursuant to section 35-36-104;

Take possession of all commodities in the public warehouse owned, operated, or controlled by the warehouse operator and of all books, papers, records, and property of all kinds used in connection with the conduct or operation of the warehouse operator's public warehouse business, whether the books, papers, records, and property pertain specifically, exclusively, directly, or indirectly to that business or are related to the warehouse operator's handling, storage, or use of commodities in any other business;

Apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for an order to enjoin the warehouse operator from interfering with the department in the discharge of its duties as required by this section;

Petition any court of competent jurisdiction for an order requiring the warehouse operator or any person who has possession of any commodities, books, papers, records, or property of any kind used in connection with the conduct or operation of the public warehouse business who has refused to surrender possession to the department to surrender possession of the same to the department.

Upon its taking possession of the commodities, the department may give written notice of its action to the holders of all negotiable warehouse receipts or other evidence of deposits issued for commodities to present their negotiable warehouse receipts or other evidence of deposits for inspection or to account for the same. Thereupon, the department shall cause an audit to be made of the affairs of the public warehouse with respect to any commodity in which there is an apparent shortage, determine the amount of the shortage, and compute the shortage as to each owner of the commodity. The department shall attempt to notify the warehouse operator of the amount of the shortage and attempt to notify each owner affected by the shortage. If the owner cannot be notified after a reasonable attempt by the department, the department is not liable for any losses incurred by the owner.

The department shall retain possession of the commodity in the public warehouse and of the books, papers, records, and property of the warehouse operator until such time as the warehouse operator or the warehouse operator's bond or irrevocable letter of credit has satisfied the claims of all holders of negotiable warehouse receipts or other evidence of deposits. In case the shortage exceeds the amount of the bond or irrevocable letter of credit, the warehouse operator's bond or irrevocable letter of credit satisfies the claims pro rata. Nothing in this section prevents the department from complying with an order of a court of competent jurisdiction to surrender possession.

If, during or after the audit provided for in this section or at any other time, the department is of the opinion that the warehouse operator is insolvent or in danger of becoming insolvent or is unable to satisfy the claims of all holders of negotiable warehouse receipts or other evidence of deposits, the department may petition a court of competent jurisdiction in the county for the appointment of a receiver to operate or liquidate the business of the warehouse operator in accordance with applicable law.

At any time within ten days after the department takes possession of any commodities or the books, papers, records, and property of any public warehouse, the warehouse operator may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for an order requiring the department to show cause why the commodities, books, papers, records, and property should not be restored to the warehouse operator's possession. Upon its being served notice, the department has up to ten days to respond.

If a court of competent jurisdiction determines that all or any part of the commodities, books, papers, records, and property should not be restored to the possession of the warehouse operator, the court may:

Appoint a receiver for all or any part of the commodities, books, papers, records, and property; or

Determine the disposition of the commodities, books, papers, records, and property that were in the public warehouse and seized pursuant to this part 2.

Pending determination of the ownership of the commodities, any money received from the disposition of the commodities shall be placed in an interest-bearing escrow account.

If the warehouse operator does not apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a show-cause order under subsection (6) of this section, the department's action is presumed valid, and the commissioner may determine the disposition of the commodities, books, papers, records, and property that were in the public warehouse and seized pursuant to this part 2. Pending determination of the ownership of the commodities, any money received from the disposition of the commodities shall be placed in an interest-bearing escrow account.

All expenses incurred by the department in carrying out this section are a first charge and lien upon the assets of the warehouse operator; and the department may bring a separate civil action through representation by the attorney general in a court in the county in which the public warehouse is located to recover the expenses, or they may be recovered at the same time and as a part of an action filed under subsection (5) of this section.

As a part of the expenses incurred by the department in carrying out this section, the department or the receiver is authorized to include the cost of adequate liability insurance necessary to protect the department, its officers, and others engaged in carrying out this section.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 735, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-36-117 as it existed prior to 2020.